California statutes. Education Code
  CHAPTER 1. Leland Stanford Junior University [94000. - 94021.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [94000. - 94002.]

94000.

The trustees of the Leland Stanford Junior University may exercise corporate powers and privileges. To that end they may:

(a) Organize and act as a board of trustees.

(b) Elect such officers of the board as they deem necessary.

(c) Adopt bylaws.

As a board, and through the officers thereof, they may transact such business, perform such acts and exercise such powers as they in writing provide may be transacted, performed, and exercised by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94001.

The board may adopt a seal which shall read, “Seal of the Leland Stanford Junior University.” The seal, when attached to any document or writing is prima facie evidence that the document or writing was made by and under due authority from the board and from the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94002.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to alter the tenure or limit the powers or obligations of the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tuition [94010. - 94010.]

94010.

The trustees of the Leland Stanford Junior University may charge residents and nonresidents of this state such fees for tuition, as are necessary for the administration of the affairs of the university.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Taxation [94020. - 94021.]

94020.

The exemption from taxation of the Leland Stanford Junior University is as provided in Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. However, the university shall hold exempt from taxation all real property used by it exclusively for educational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 50.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

94021.

Property held in trust for the founding, maintenance or benefit of the Leland Stanford Junior University shall be deemed to be held and used by the university exclusively for educational purposes as required by Section 2 of Article XX of the California Constitution if it constitutes part of a medical facility wherein medical students, interns, residents and fellows receive medical training or participate in medical research.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to clarify Section 2 of Article XX of the California Constitution and to clarify the provisions of Section 94020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 51.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. General Provisions [94050. - 94050.]

94050.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to prevent deceptive and misleading use of the terms “college” and “university” by businesses and other organizations that present themselves as institutions of higher education but are not authorized to operate as private postsecondary educational institutions under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700).

(b) No person shall designate a business, social, political, religious, or other organization operating in this state, including, but not limited to, any firm, association, partnership, or corporation, as a “college” or “university.”

(c) This section does not apply to the designation of any of the following:

(1) A postsecondary or vocational educational institution established, operated, and governed by a public entity, or by a firm, association, partnership, or corporation using the name of that institution with the permission of the institution.

(2) A nonprofit religious institution described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 94739.

(3) A bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organization that either sponsors no educational services or sponsors educational services solely for the membership of the organization.

(d) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California Educational Facilities Authority Act [94100. - 94213.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purpose [94100. - 94103.]

94100.

It is the purpose of this chapter to accomplish all of the following:

(a) To give this and future generations of youth the fullest opportunity to learn and develop their intellectual and mental capacities by providing private institutions of higher education within the state with an additional means by which to expand, enlarge, and establish dormitory, academic, and related facilities, to finance those facilities, and to refinance existing facilities.

(b) To provide private and public institutions of higher education within the state with an additional means to assist students in financing their costs of attendance.

(c) To develop student, faculty, and staff housing on or near public and participating private institutions of higher education through the use of agreements with participating nonprofit entities.

(d) To make grants to private institutions of higher education to assist students in preparing for higher education and college entrance, pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 94215).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

94101.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Educational Facilities Authority Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94102.

All assets and obligations of the California Student Loan Authority, as of the effective date of the act that enacts this section during the 1995–96 Regular Session, are hereby transferred to, and assumed by, the California Educational Facilities Authority. All of those assets shall be used solely for student loan purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 917, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

94102.1.

In addition to the definition provided in Section 94110, “student loan” may also mean loan assumptions pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69612) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 33.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

94103.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no city, county, city and county, district, or other local jurisdiction shall operate, or request or authorize another entity, including, but not necessarily limited to, a corporation, either directly or through an intermediary, to do either of the following:

(1) Finance, or purchase or take assignments of, or make commitments to finance, any loan, or otherwise acquire any student loan note, including, but not necessarily limited to, any loan guaranteed under the Federal Family Education Loan Program established under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, that is made to finance or refinance the costs of attendance at any institution of higher education, including any public and nonprofit private or independent degree-granting educational institution.

(2) Issue bonds, notes, debentures, or other securities involving any loan, including, but not necessarily limited to, any loan guaranteed under the Federal Family Education Loan Program established under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, that is made to finance or refinance the costs of attendance at any institution of higher education, including any public and nonprofit private or independent degree-granting educational institution.

(b) Any entity that, as of January 1, 2006, is not qualified to be awarded an allocation of the state’s annual private activity volume cap to issue qualified scholarship funding bonds, as defined in subsection (d) of Section 150 of Title 26 of the United States Code as it exists on January 1, 2006, shall obtain approval from the authority to operate as a qualified scholarship funding corporation within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 150 of Title 26 of the United States Code as it exists on January 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 318, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [94110. - 94110.]

94110.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following meanings, unless the context indicates or requires another or different meaning or intent:

(a) “Authority” means the California Educational Facilities Authority created by this chapter or any board, body, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the authority or to whom the power conferred upon the authority by this chapter is given by law.

(b) “Bond” means bonds, notes, debentures, securities, or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Cost,” as applied to a project or portion of a project financed
 under this chapter, means all, or any part of, the cost of construction and acquisition of lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project, the cost of demolishing or removing buildings or structures on acquired land, including the cost of acquiring lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest before, during, and for a period after completion of, the construction as determined by the authority, provisions for working capital, reserves for principal and interest and for extension, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations and improvements, the cost of engineering, financial and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility of constructing a project or incident to the construction or acquisition or financing of a
 project.

(d) “Dormitory” means a housing unit with necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(e) (1) “Educational facility” means a dormitory, dining hall, student union, administration building, academic building, library, laboratory, research facility, classroom, health care facility (including for an institution of higher education that maintains and operates a school of medicine, structures or facilities designed to provide services as a hospital or clinic, whether the hospital or clinic is operated directly by the institution of higher education or by a separate nonprofit corporation, the members of which consist of the educational institution or the members of its governing body), faculty and staff housing, parking, maintenance, storage, or utility facilities, and other related structures or facilities used for student
 instruction, conducting research, or operating an institution for higher education, and related facilities and equipment.

(2) “Educational facility” does not include a facility used, or to be used, for sectarian instruction or as a place for religious worship, or a facility used, or to be used, primarily in connection with a part of the program of a school or department of divinity.

(f) “Faculty and staff housing” means a residential unit owned by a participating college or participating nonprofit entity for use by an individual holding a faculty appointment or a staff position at a public university, public college, or participating college.

(g) “Participating nonprofit entity” means an entity within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code that, pursuant to
 this chapter for the purpose of owning student, faculty, or staff housing, as approved by, and for participation with, the authority, undertakes the financing and construction or acquisition of student, faculty, or staff housing, on real property owned or leased by the entity, for the benefit of a public college, public university, or participating private college. The authority may determine any additional qualifications of a participating nonprofit entity through regulations or guidelines.

(h) “Participating private college” or “participating college” means a private college that participates with the authority in undertaking the financing of working capital or the financing and construction or acquisition of a project and does not restrict the admission of a student based on the student’s race or ethnicity, provided that the financing does not violate Section 5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution or the establishment clause of the
 First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

(i) (1) “Private college” means an institution for higher education other than a public college, situated within the state and that, by virtue of law or charter, is a nonprofit private or independent degree-granting educational institution that is regionally accredited and empowered to provide a program of education beyond the high school level.

(2) For purposes of obtaining financing under this chapter, “private college” also includes either of the following:

(A) A nonprofit affiliate, established on or before January 1, 2005, of one or more private colleges, as defined in paragraph (1), the sole or primary purpose of which is to provide administrative or other support services to an affiliated private college or private colleges, and that
 undertakes the financing of a project or working capital for the exclusive use and benefit of one or more of the affiliated private colleges.

(B) A private nonprofit research organization engaged in basic research and advanced education at the predoctoral and postdoctoral levels through personnel situated within the state, but only if the organization previously has borrowed the proceeds of bonds or other obligations previously issued by the authority.

(j) (1) “Project” means a dormitory or an educational facility, faculty or staff housing, or any combination thereof, or any function concerning student loans, or interests in student loans, as determined by the authority.

(2) For a participating nonprofit entity, “project” means the construction or acquisition of student housing or faculty and
 staff housing. The authority, in consultation with the top administrative officials and the participating nonprofit entity, shall develop and adopt regulations to ensure, to the greatest extent practicable, that each project involving a participating nonprofit entity is used to house students, faculty, or staff of the participating private college, public college, or public university. The student, faculty, or staff housing shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) Upon completion or acquisition of the project, the project will be owned by a participating nonprofit entity and located on real property owned, or leased by, that entity.

(B) The top administrative official of the public university, public college, or participating private college that the project is intended to benefit, verifies the need for housing and financing assistance in a specific area pursuant to
 subparagraph (D).

(C) The project is monitored on an annual basis by the authority to ensure that it meets the requirements of subparagraph (E) and all other regulatory agreements entered into by the authority.

(D) The project is located within a five-mile radius of the boundary of a campus or satellite center of the public college, public university, or participating private college that the project is intended to benefit. The participating nonprofit entity may request approval from the top official of the institution for a project that is located outside the five-mile radius, provided that all of the following criteria are met:

(i) There are no available and feasible sites within the five-mile radius.

(ii) The project is near a mass transit
 destination.

(iii) The time required to commute from campus to the mass transit destination, as estimated by the top administrative official, typically does not exceed 30 minutes.

(E) (i) The project includes and maintains for 40 years a restriction to the grant deed on the real property on which the student or faculty and staff housing is to be located. The grant deed shall accomplish all of the following:

(I) Give the public college, public university, or participating private college that the project is intended to benefit the right, but not the obligation, to purchase the property at fair market value.

(II) Ensure that students, faculty, or staff of the affected campus will have first right of refusal to all available
 units.

(III) Require that, to the greatest extent feasible, at least 50 percent of student residents will meet the criteria for need-based financial assistance, as determined by the top administrative official of the affected campus.

(IV) Require that all contracts for construction and renovation of the proposed project shall be subject to, and comply with the provisions referenced in, Section 10128 of the Public Contract Code.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the authority, through regulation or rule, shall define “student” and “faculty,” taking into consideration enrollment status requirements and employment status requirements. The definitions of “student” and “faculty” may be different for each participating campus.

(3) For a university applicant, “project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 67329.2.

(k) “Public college” means a community college.

(l) “Public university” means any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the Hastings College of the Law.

(m) “Student housing,” as applied to a participating nonprofit entity, means a residential unit owned by a participating nonprofit entity, and located on real property owned by that entity, for use by an individual enrolled at a public college, public
 university, or participating private college.

(n) “Student loan” means a loan having terms and conditions acceptable to the authority that is made to finance or refinance the costs of attendance at a private college or a public college and that is approved by the authority, if the loan is originated pursuant to a program that is approved by the authority.

(o) “Top administrative official” means the chancellor in the case of a campus of the University of California, the dean in the case of the Hastings College of the Law, the president in the case of a campus of the California State University, the president in the case of a campus of the California Community Colleges, or the president or highest ranking official in the case of a participating private college.

(p) “University applicant” has the same meaning as defined in Section 67329.2.

(q) “Working capital” means maintenance or operation expenses or any other costs that would be treated as an expense item, under generally accepted accounting principles, in connection with the ownership or operation of an educational facility, faculty or staff housing, student housing, or any combination thereof, including, but not limited to, reserves for maintenance or operation expenses, interest on any loan for working capital made pursuant to this part, and reserves for debt service with respect to, and
 any costs necessary or incidental to, that financing.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 123, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 18.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Organization of Authority and General Powers and Duties Thereof [94120. - 94125.]

94120.

(a) There is in the state government an authority known as the California Educational Facilities Authority. The authority constitutes a public instrumentality and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function.

(b) The authority shall consist of five members: the Director of Finance, the Controller, the Treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson of the authority, and two members appointed by the Governor to serve for terms of four years; provided that the terms of the members first appointed shall be arranged by the Governor so that such terms shall expire on April 30 in different years. One of the members appointed by the Governor shall be affiliated with a public institution of higher education as a governing board member or in an administrative capacity and the other member shall be affiliated with a private institution of higher education as a governing board member or in an administrative capacity. Each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and shall continue to serve during the term of his or her successor unless and until his or her successor shall have been appointed and qualified. Any vacancy among the members appointed by the Governor shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term only. A member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.

(c) Any member of the authority appointed by the Governor may be removed from office by the Governor for cause after a public hearing.

(d) The members of the authority shall serve without compensation, but the authority may reimburse its members for necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(e) The authority, upon the first appointment of its members and thereafter on or after April 30 in each year, shall annually elect from among its members a vice chairperson who shall hold office until April 30 next ensuing and shall continue to serve during the term of his or her successor unless and until his or her successor shall have been appointed and qualified.

(f) The Director of Finance may designate a deputy or other official in the Department of Finance to act for him or her and represent him or her at all meetings of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 211, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

94121.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in the members thereof in office from time to time and a majority of the total authorized membership of the authority shall constitute a quorum at any meeting thereof. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the authority at any meeting thereof by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present, unless in any case the bylaws of the authority shall require a larger number. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

94123.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law neither of the following is a conflict of interest:

(a) Service by a trustee, director, officer, or employee of a participating private college, public college, or public university as a member of the authority, provided that the trustee, director, officer, or employee abstains from discussion, deliberation, action, and vote by the authority under this chapter with respect to the participating private college, public college, or public university for which that member is a trustee, director, officer, or employee.

(b) Affiliation of a member of the authority with a bank that serves the authority as bond trustee, depository of funds, or in any other financial, advisory, or fiduciary capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 569, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

94124.

The authority shall maintain an office in the City of Sacramento.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94125.

The authority may employ an executive director and such other persons as are necessary to enable it properly to perform the duties imposed upon it by this chapter. The authority may, by resolution, delegate to one or more of its members, its executive director, or any other official or employee of the authority any powers and duties that it may deem proper, including, but not limited to, the power to enter into contracts on behalf of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 211, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties; Notes and Bonds [94140. - 94156.]

94140.

The authority shall have power to do all of the following:

(a) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(b) Adopt and have an official common seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded.

(d) Borrow money, issue bonds and notes and other obligations of the authority, and provide for the rights of the holders thereof as provided in this chapter.

(e) Acquire, lease as lessee, hold, and dispose of real and personal property or any interest
 therein, in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under this chapter.

(f) Acquire, in the name of the authority by purchase or otherwise, on the terms and conditions and in the manner as it deems proper, any land or interest in land and other property that it determines is reasonably necessary for a project, including any lands held by a county, municipality, or other governmental subdivision of the state, to hold and use the property, and to sell, convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of the acquired property that is no longer necessary for the authority’s purposes.

(g) Receive and accept, from any source, loans, contributions, or grants for, or in aid of, the financing or refinancing of working capital or the acquisition, construction, financing, or refinancing of a project, or any portion of a project, in money, property, labor, or other things of
 value.

(h) Prepare, or cause to be prepared, plans, specifications, designs, and estimates of costs for the construction and equipment of projects for participating
 colleges, participating nonprofit entities, and university applicants under this chapter, and from time to time to modify those plans, specifications, designs, or estimates.

(i) By contract or contracts, or by its own employees, to construct, acquire, reconstruct, rehabilitate and improve, and furnish and equip, projects for participating colleges, participating nonprofit
 entities, and university applicants.

(j) Employ consulting engineers, architects, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, and other employees and agents that may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation.

(k) Determine the location and character of any project to be undertaken pursuant to this chapter, and construct, reconstruct, repair, lease, as lessee or lessor, the project, enter into contracts for any or all of those purposes, and designate a participating private college, participating nonprofit
 entity, or university applicant as its agent to determine the location and character of a project undertaken by the participating private college, participating nonprofit entity, or university applicant under this chapter and, as the agent of the authority, construct, reconstruct, maintain, repair, operate, lease, as lessee or lessor, and regulate the project and, as agent of the authority, to enter into contracts for any and all of those purposes including contracts for the management and operation of the project.

(l) Establish rules and regulations for the use of a project, or any portion of a project, and to designate a participating private college, participating nonprofit entity, or university applicant as its agent to establish rules and regulations for the use of a project undertaken by the participating private college, participating nonprofit
 entity, or university applicant.

(m) Generally establish, revise from time to time, and charge and collect, rates, rents, fees, and other charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by a project, or any portion of a project, and contract with holders of its bonds and with any other person, party, association, corporation, or other body, public or private, in respect thereof.

(n) Enter into any and all agreements or contracts, execute any and all instruments, and do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the authority or to carry out any power expressly given in this chapter.

(o) Invest any moneys held in reserve or sinking funds, or any moneys not required for immediate use or disbursement,
 at the discretion of the authority, in obligations that are authorized by law for the investment of trust funds in the custody of the Treasurer.

(p) Charge, and equitably apportion among participating private colleges and participating nonprofit entities, its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this chapter.

(q) Finance, directly or through an intermediary, or purchase or take assignments of, or make commitments to finance, directly or through an intermediary, or purchase or to take assignments of, student loans, to contract in advance for those student loans, and to contract in advance for that financing, purchase, or assignment, and to pay any amounts payable in respect thereto. A student loan shall be eligible for financing or purchase by the authority or for assignment hereunder regardless of the repayment status of
 the loan. A pledge made to secure authority financing for student loan project purposes shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues and receipts of property or interest in the property pledged and thereafter received by the authority, a participating college or public institution of higher education, a servicer, a trustee, or a custodian shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of a pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, participating college or public institution of higher education, servicer, trustee, or custodian irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

(r) Hold or invest in student loans, create pools of student loans, and sell
 bonds bearing interest on a taxable or tax-exempt basis or other interests backed by the pools of student loans.

(s) Contract or otherwise provide for the distribution, processing, origination, purchase, sale, servicing, securing, and collection of student loans, the payment of fees, charges, and administrative expenses in connection with student loans, and the funding of reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing, authority financing for student loan purposes.

(t) Assist in providing support to participating colleges, participating nonprofit
 entities, or university applicants to enhance the market acceptance of potential bond issues by the authority, including securing probable or actual credit ratings from nationally recognized bond rating agencies, providing or obtaining liquidity or credit enhancement, providing or securing bond reserve funds, performing any other action deemed necessary by the authority, and incurring necessary expenses, payable from available authority funds, for any of these purposes.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 123, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 19.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

94141.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be payable from funds provided the authority therefor, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94142.

The authority shall establish financial eligibility standards by studying the creditworthiness and earning capacity of each project together with the amount of pledged revenues, debt service coverage, and basic security, in addition to establishing machinery to monitor the ongoing compliance of each project with state authority and bond indenture requirements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94143.

The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its notes for any corporate purpose and renew from time to time any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. A resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue of notes of the authority may contain any provisions that the authority is authorized to include in a resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue of bonds of the authority, and the authority may include in the notes any terms, covenants, or conditions that it is
 authorized to include in bonds. Notes issued by the authority shall be payable from revenues of the authority or other moneys available for payment of notes and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of its notes or other obligations then outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 140.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

94144.

(a) The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its bonds for any corporate purpose. In anticipation of the sale of the bonds, the authority may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. The bond anticipation notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority or other moneys available for payment of bond anticipation notes and not otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which the bond anticipation notes were issued. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued in the same manner as the bonds. The bond anticipation notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bond anticipation notes may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a bond resolution of the authority may contain.

(b) Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its bonds or notes shall be general obligations of the authority payable from any revenues or moneys of the authority available for payment of the bonds or notes and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds or notes pledging any particular revenues or moneys and subject to any agreements with any participating institution or university applicant. Negotiable bonds and notes shall be and be deemed to be, for all purposes, negotiable instruments, notwithstanding the fact that the negotiable bonds or notes may be payable from a special fund, subject only to the provisions of the bonds or notes for registration.

(c) (1) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds, or the authority, in its discretion, may issue bonds of both types. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, and shall bear the date or dates, mature at a time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates, bear interest at the rate or rates, be payable at the time or times, be in denominations, be in a form, either coupon or registered, carry registration privileges, be executed in a manner, be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at a place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption that the resolution or resolutions may provide. The bonds or notes may be sold by the Treasurer at public sale, or the authority, after giving due consideration to the recommendations of the participating
 institution,
 participating nonprofit entity, or university applicant, may direct the Treasurer to sell the bonds or notes at private sale.

(2) In the case of public sale, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The bonds specified in the resolution shall be sold by the Treasurer, at a time fixed by the Treasurer, and upon notice that the Treasurer may deem advisable, or at
 the time to which the sale shall have been continued, at public sale, upon sealed bids, to the bidder whose bid will result in the lowest net interest cost on account of the bonds.

(B) If no bids are received, or if the Treasurer determines that the bids are not satisfactory, the Treasurer may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(3) Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates that shall be exchanged for the definitive bonds.

(d) A resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds or an issue of bonds may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds to be authorized, as to all of the following:

(1) Pledging the full faith and credit of the authority or pledging all or any part of the revenues of a project or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any individual, partnership, corporation, or association or other body, public or private, to secure the payment of the bonds or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to those agreements with bondholders that may then exist.

(2) The rents, fees, and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year by the rents, fees, and other charges to be charged, and the use and disposition of the revenues.

(3) The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation and disposition of the reserves or sinking funds.

(4) Limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate
 the use of the project.

(5) Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of an issue of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied and pledging the proceeds of sale to secure the payment of the bonds or an issue of the bonds.

(6) Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

(7) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of a contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which that consent may be given.

(8) Limitations on the amount of moneys derived from the project to be expended for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the
 authority.

(9) Defining the acts or omissions to act that constitute a default in the duties of the authority to holders of its obligations, and providing the rights and remedies of the holders in the event of a default.

(10) The mortgaging of a project and the site of the project for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(e) Members of the authority and persons executing the bonds or notes shall not be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds or notes.

(f) The authority shall have the power to purchase its bonds or notes out of any funds available for purchasing its bonds or notes. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell the bonds, subject to